Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.455

State agency office relocation pool account.

The state agency office relocation pool account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations and transfers must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for state agency costs related to relocation of state agency offices. Authorized expenditures include lease payments and costs of relocation, equipment, furniture, and tenant improvements. Only the director of the office of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 949.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: "Except for section 990 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 30, 2017]." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 1903.]